Mississippi, session 2026, HB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of Section 25-4-105, Section 25-4-101 and any other law to the contrary, any member of a county board of supervisors is authorized to hold his or her position as a supervisor while being employed by a community college district. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.